test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-seemda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sēmḑa: # Noun 53 'eng /est piim/fin' - full paradigm
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Nom: sēmḑa
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Gen: sēmḑa
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Par: semḑi
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Dat: sēmḑan
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Ins: sēmḑaks
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Ill: semḑõ
     sēmḑa+N+Sg+Ela: sēmḑast
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Nom: sēmḑad
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Gen: sēmḑad
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Par: sēmḑidi
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Dat: sēmḑadõn
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Ins: sēmḑadõks
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Ill: sēmḑiž
     sēmḑa+N+Pl+Ela: sēmḑist
